Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-23,104
Assignment of securities; when.

In lieu of placing its unqualified endorsement on each security, a bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution depositing, pledging, or granting a security interest in securities pursuant to subsection (1) of section 77-2398 that are not negotiable without its endorsement or assignment may furnish to the qualified trustee holding the securities an appropriate resolution and irrevocable power of attorney authorizing the trustee to assign the securities. The resolution and power of attorney shall conform to such terms and conditions as the trustee prescribes.

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 49;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 98.